Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 15. Refunding Bonds

§ 31-15-1.
Short title.

Sections 31-15-1 through 31-15-19 may be cited as the “General Refunding Law of 1934.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4358; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-3.
Definitions.

Whenever used in Sections 31-15-1 through 31-15-19, the words “political subdivision” shall be deemed as including any county, city, town, or village, whether operating under the code chapter, a special charter, or the commission form of government; and any supervisors district, road district, municipal separate school district, rural separate school district, consolidated school district, line separate school district, or school district of any other form.

The words “governing authority”, wherever used in the aforesaid sections, shall be understood as referring to the following: for counties, supervisors districts, road districts, school districts (other than municipal separate school districts), the board of supervisors of the county; for cities, towns, or villages operating under the code, the board of mayor and aldermen thereof; for cities, towns, or villages operating under special charters, the legislative body thereof created by such charters; for cities, towns, or villages operating under the commission form of government, the council or commission thereof; for municipal separate school districts, the governing authority of the city, town, or village within such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4359; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-5.
Election not required.

The governing authority of any political subdivision may, without an election on the question of the issuance thereof, issue the bonds of such subdivision for the purpose of refunding any bonded indebtedness of such subdivision now or hereafter outstanding, whether such bonded indebtedness shall at the time of such refunding be due or to mature in the future, and regardless of whether the issuance of such refunding bonds shall create a total bonded indebtedness of such subdivision in excess of the then existing statutory limitation of debt.

The board of supervisors of any county may issue the bonds of any county, consolidated school district, rural separate school district or separate road district, for the purpose of refunding the outstanding bonded indebtedness of any such county or district when the same shall mature, whether now due or to become due in the future without notice and without an election on the question of the issuance of same, regardless of whether or not the issuance of such bonds shall create a total bonded indebtedness in excess of the then existing statutory limitation of debt.

Such bonds may be issued in sufficient amount to pay and retire any of the then outstanding bonds, whether matured or to mature in the future, together with interest thereon to the date of the refunding bonds or to such prior date as the governing authority may determine; and such power to refund such bonds and interest may be exercised whenever funds available from taxes are not sufficient to pay such outstanding bonds and the interest thereon whenever they may mature.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6662j; 1930, § 5986; 1942, §§ 4346, 4360; Laws, 1920, ch. 207; Laws, 1932, ch. 167; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-7.
Interest and form.

Such refunding bonds shall bear such rate or rates of interest as may be determined by the governing body, not exceeding, however, six percent (6%) per annum payable semi-annually; shall be in such denomination or denominations and form as may be determined by resolution or order of the governing authority; and shall be executed in behalf of the subdivision by such officer or officers thereof as may be determined in such resolution or order. The interest to accrue on such refunding bonds shall be represented by coupons to be attached thereto, which may be executed by the facsimile signature of such officer or officers. All such bonds shall be made to mature serially, beginning not more than five (5) years and running not longer than thirty (30) years after their date, with not less than one percent (1%) of the total issue to mature each year during the first six (6) years, beginning in the fifth year, after the date of such bonds; not less than three percent (3%) of the said total issue to mature annually during the next succeeding ten-year (10-year) period of the life of such bonds; and not less than five percent (5%) of said total issue to mature annually during the next succeeding ten-year (10-year) period of the life of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4361; Laws, 1934, ch. 143; Laws, 1936, ch. 279; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 74.

§ 31-15-9.
Sale and redemption; acceptance of bonds.

The resolution or order providing for the issuance of such bonds may reserve unto the governing authority the right to call in, pay, and redeem such bonds in the inverse order of their numbers and maturities, prior to the maturity date or dates thereof on any interest payment date. Whenever it is desired to exercise the aforesaid right, if reserved in such resolution or order, the governing authority shall cause written notice thereof to be delivered to the bank or office at which such bonds are payable. Such notice shall be so delivered not less than thirty days prior to the interest payment date designated for the redemption of such bonds, after which date so designated, no further interest shall accrue on the bonds so called for redemption. Such refunding bonds may be sold for not less than par and accrued interest, or may be exchanged at par for bonds and interest coupons to be refunded thereby.

The board of supervisors may accept county bonds, consolidated school district bonds, rural separate school district bonds or separate road district bonds, as the case may be, at not more than par and interest accruing thereon at the rate fixed in the bonds to be refunded in exchange for said refunding county bonds, consolidated school district bonds, rural separate school district bonds or separate road district bonds, as the case may be. In accepting any bond in exchange for, or in payment of, any such refunding bond, no bond shall be accepted in such exchange or payment that is secured by the property of a smaller or different district, or other subdivision, than that securing the refunding bonds so issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6662j; 1930, § 5986; 1942, §§ 4346, 4361; Laws, 1920, ch. 207; Laws, 1932, ch. 167; Laws, 1934, ch. 143; Laws, 1936, ch. 279; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 74.

§ 31-15-11.
General obligations.

All refunding bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 31-15-1 through 31-15-19 shall be general obligations of the political subdivisions issuing same, and the governing authority of such subdivision shall annually levy a tax upon all taxable property therein sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same matures and accrues. The full faith, credit, and resources of such subdivision shall be and are hereby irrevocably pledged to the payment of such bonds, both as to principal and interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4362; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-13.
Time limit.

The governing authority may, at any time or times, exercise the powers granted by Sections 31-15-1 through 31-15-19 in the refunding of any or all of the bonds and interest coupons of any one (1) or more of the issues of bonds then outstanding. No refunding bonds shall be issued at any time after three (3) years from the date of the resolution or order providing therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4363; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-15.
Invalid bonds.

In the event that any of the refunding bonds authorized to be issued under Sections 31-15-1 through 31-15-19 should be declared by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the holder or holders thereof shall be subrogated to all of the rights, remedies, and privileges had and possessed by the holder or holders of the bonds or interest coupons refunded thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4364; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-17.
Additional method.

Sections 31-15-1 through 31-15-19, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full and complete authority for the issuance of refunding bonds by political subdivisions of the state, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor. None of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions, or limitations of law applicable to the issuance of bonds by political subdivisions of this state shall apply to the issuance and sale or exchange of bonds under the aforesaid sections, and no proceedings shall be required for the issuance of such bonds other than those provided for and required herein. All powers necessary to be exercised by the governing authority of any such political subdivision in order to carry out the provisions of said sections are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4365; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-19.
Validation.

Any bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 31-15-1 through 31-15-19 may be validated under Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4366; Laws, 1934, ch. 143.

§ 31-15-21.
Refund of bonds not based on ad valorem tax.

Any bonds heretofore or hereafter issued under authority of Sections 21-27-11, 21-27-23, 21-27-41 through 21-27-43, or revenue bonds payable from funds other than the proceeds of ad valorem taxes heretofore or hereafter issued under authority of any other law of the State of Mississippi may be refunded upon surrender, whether such bonds are due, optional, or not yet matured. Such refunding bonds shall be negotiable, shall be authorized by resolution adopted by the board or governing body which shall have authorized the bonds that are being refunded, and may either be delivered in exchange for the bonds to be refunded or sold at not less than par and the proceeds applied to the retirement of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4367; Laws, 1940, ch. 281.

§ 31-15-23.
Interest and form.

Such refunding bonds may bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-103, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from their date, may be subject to redemption at such times and at such premiums, and shall be in such form and in all other respects be of such details and issued under such conditions as may be determined in the resolution authorizing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4368; Laws, 1940, ch. 281; Laws, 1987, ch. 407, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1987).

§ 31-15-25.
Security.

Such refunding bonds shall be payable from the same sources of revenue and so far as possible shall be secured in the same manner and by the same covenants and agreements as were the bonds refunded. All provisions of the law under which the bonds refunded were issued, which provide for the security of such bonds and the requirements for fixing rates sufficient to operate the project acquired or improved and to pay principal of and interest on the bonds, shall remain in effect and shall be fully applicable to the refunding bonds issued hereunder. In no event shall taxes be levied for the payment of such bonds, and they shall recite on their face that they are payable only from revenues.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4369; Laws, 1940, ch. 281.

§ 31-15-27.
Validation.

Refunding bonds issued under Sections 31-15-21 through 31-15-27 may be validated in the chancery court pursuant to the provisions of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, and shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal, and other taxation under the laws of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4370; Laws, 1940, ch. 281.